Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-951
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Medicaid Prescription Drug Act is to provide appropriate pharmaceutical care to medicaid recipients in a cost-effective manner by requiring the establishment of a preferred drug list and other activities as prescribed. The preferred drug list and other activities mandated by the act shall not be construed to replace, prohibit, or limit other lawful activities of the department not specifically permitted or required by the act.

Laws 2008, LB830, § 3.